District of Columbia statutes.
23-1328

Penalties for offenses committed during release.

(a)

Any person convicted of an offense committed while released pursuant to section 23-1321 shall be subject to the following penalties in addition to any other applicable penalties:

(1)

A term of imprisonment of not less than one year and not more than five years if convicted of committing a felony while so released; and

(2)

A term of imprisonment of not less than ninety days and not more than 180 days if convicted of committing a misdemeanor while so released.

(b)

The giving of a warning to the person when released of the penalties imposed by this section shall not be a prerequisite to the application of this section.

(c)

Any term of imprisonment imposed pursuant to this section shall be consecutive to any other sentence of imprisonment.

(d)

In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 649, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 101(d), 41 DCR 2608
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 311(a), 60 DCR 2064
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 311(a) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(d) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added (d).
1973 Ed., § 23-1328.
1981 Ed., § 23-1328.
This section is referenced in § 23-1303 and § 23-1322.